Rhode Island statutes. Title 33 Probate Practice and Procedure
Chapter 12 Payment of Decedents’ Debts and Charges

33-12-1.
Estate chargeable with debts.

The estate, real and personal, of every deceased person shall be chargeable with the expenses of administration, including allowances to widow and family, the funeral charges of the deceased, including the cost of a place of burial, if necessary, and the payment of his or her debts; and the same shall be paid by the executor or administrator out of the estate, so far as the same shall be sufficient therefor.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 966; G.L. 1909, ch. 318, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 369, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 579, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-12-1

.

33-12-2.
Order of application of property.

The personal estate shall be first chargeable for expenses, charges, and debts, and the real estate shall be chargeable only so far as the personal estate is insufficient for that purpose, except as otherwise provided by law or will.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 967; G.L. 1909, ch. 318, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 369, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 579, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

33-12-2

.

33-12-3.
Expenses included in expenses of administration.

The expenses of the division and assignment of real estate, and of the appointment of guardians of minors and others incapacitated to take care of their interests, whether they be heirs or legatees, except there be an appeal from the order making or appointing the same, shall be included in the expenses of administration.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 968; G.L. 1909, ch. 318, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 369, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 579, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

33-12-3

; P.L. 1995, ch. 323, § 26.

33-12-4.
Sale or mortgage of real estate when personalty insufficient.

If the personal property of a deceased person is insufficient to pay his or her debts, funeral expenses, charges of administration, and the expense of supporting his or her family, as prescribed by law, and the legacies as are expressly or impliedly charged upon the real estate, his or her executor or administrator shall sell or mortgage for an amount decreed, in the manner provided in this chapter, so much of his or her real estate or of any interest in the real estate as may be subject to and required for the purpose of payments.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 734; G.L. 1909, ch. 308, § 1; P.L. 1918, ch. 1640, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 359, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 570, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-12-4

.

33-12-5.
Real estate not devised applied first.

Unless a different intention appear by the will, real estate not devised shall be subjected to the payment of debts and legacies, before real estate devised.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 735; G.L. 1909, ch. 308, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 359, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 570, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

33-12-5

.

33-12-6.
Sale of real estate to effect prompt settlement of estate.

The executor or administrator may sell the real estate of a deceased person despite the sufficiency of the personal property to pay the debts, funeral expenses and the items above enumerated whenever in the discretion of the probate court this action seems desirable in effecting a prompt and efficient settlement of the estate; provided, however, that this authority shall not be given with reference to real estate specifically devised, unless the specific devisees consent in writing thereto. An executor with a valid power of sale under a will may convey specifically devised property with the written consent of the specific devisee.

History of Section.

G.L. ch. 570, § 1, as enacted by P.L. 1945, ch. 1563, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-12-6

; P.L. 1962, ch. 127, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 221, § 1.

33-12-7.
Powers of temporary executors and administrators with will annexed over realty.

Executors for the time being, or administrators with the will annexed, shall have the same powers to sell, lease, mortgage, or make conveyances of real estate as are given by will to the original executors, unless these powers are expressly given to the executors as individuals apart from the office, or unless provision to the contrary be made in the will.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 840; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 26; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 26; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 24; G.L. 1956, §

33-12-7

.

33-12-8.
Public or private sale of assets.

Any sale of the assets of an estate by the executor or administrator shall be made at public auction, after reasonable notice of the sale, or by private sale under the advice and direction of the probate court, provided that this advice and direction shall not be required in the case of a sale at private sale by an executor or an administrator with the will annexed in the exercise of a power to sell at private sale conferred on him or her by the will. A private sale, unless authorized by the probate court or by the will, or a sale by auction improperly made, shall be deemed maladministration.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1000; G.L. 1909, ch. 319, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 370, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 47; P.L. 1944, ch. 1419, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-12-8

.

33-12-9.
Application of rents and income of real estate to debts — Leases by executor or administrator.

Whenever the personal property subject to inventory, other than household furniture and stores, of any decedent shall not be sufficient to pay his or her debts and the charges against his or her estate, the probate court having jurisdiction of the estate may, instead of, or in addition to, granting leave to sell the real estate of the deceased, enter its decree empowering the executor or administrator to take upon himself or herself and supersede the possession of the heirs or devisees of the deceased, as to all or any portion of the real estate of the deceased designated in the decree, so far, and so far only, as shall be necessary to enable the executor or administrator to demand, sue for, and recover the rents and income reserved and accruing from the property after the entry of the decree from any tenants or other persons by whom rents and income shall be payable; with power also to let the property from month to month, or to make such other leases of the premises as the court shall approve and direct; and the receipt of the executor or administrator for payments made shall be valid as well against the heirs and devisees as against the executor or administrator, and any letting or lease lawfully made by the executor or administrator shall be binding also upon the heirs and devisees of the deceased; and provided, that this section shall not apply to real estate which is specifically devised, or as to which directions inconsistent with this section are given in and by a will, unless the other real estate is insufficient for the purposes of this section; and provided, further, that the court may at any time, after notice to the executor or administrator, and after a hearing, revoke its former decree without prejudice to existing leases by it approved and directed, and order the executor or administrator to surrender possession of the real estate to the heirs or devisees.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 847; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 33; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 33; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 31; P.L. 1939, ch. 659, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

33-12-9

; P.L. 1995, ch. 323, § 26.

33-12-10.
Application of rents and income from real estate for repairs, taxes, and mortgage.

The executor or administrator shall have the care and control of the real estate covered by the decree mentioned in §

33-12-9

, and shall apply so much as may be necessary of the rents and income in repairs and maintenance of the real estate and in payment of taxes and insurance on the property. He or she shall have the power, under the direction of the probate court, to apply the rents and income in payment of the interest on any mortgage on the property. And the amount received and applied shall be accounted for in his or her account as executor or administrator, and shall be subject to the approval and allowance by the court as in cases of personal property.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 848; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 34; P.L. 1922, ch. 2196, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 34; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 32; G.L. 1956, §

33-12-10

.

33-12-11.
Order of preference of debts.

If the estate of a decedent is insufficient to pay his or her debts, the same, after deducting the charges of administration, and any property as is set off and allowed to the widow and family, shall be applied to the payment of his or her debts and charges in the following order:

The necessary funeral charges of the deceased.

The necessary expenses of his or her last sickness.

Debts due to the United States.

Debts due to this state, and all state and town taxes.

Past and future child support obligations pursuant to §

33-11-51

.

Wages of labor performed within six (6) months next prior to the death of the deceased person, not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) to any one person.

Proceeds due the Rhode Island state lottery pursuant to §

42-61-6.2

.

Other debts filed within six (6) months of the first notice.

All other debts.

If there is not sufficient property to pay all the debts of any class, the creditors of that class shall be paid ratably upon their respective claims; and no payment shall be made to creditors of any class until all of those of the preceding class or classes have been paid in full.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 913; G.L. 1909, ch. 314, § 33; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, § 33; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 33; G.L. 1956, §

33-12-11

; P.L. 1981, ch. 288, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 298, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 314, § 2.

33-12-12.
Decrees for distribution of insolvent estates.

After the expiration of the time for claiming an appeal from the decree on the report of the commissioners on an insolvent estate, the probate court shall make a decree for the distribution of the estate among the creditors whose claims are allowed. If an appeal is claimed or if a suit is pending against the estate, the decree may be suspended until the determination of the appeal or suit, or a distribution may be ordered among the creditors whose claims are allowed, leaving in the hands of the executor or administrator an amount sufficient to pay claimants whose appeals or suits are pending a proportion equal to that of the other creditors. In case further assets shall come to the hands of the executor or administrator after the decree of distribution, the probate court shall make from time to time further decrees of distribution among the creditors.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 920; G.L. 1909, ch. 314, § 40; G.L. 1923, ch. 365, § 40; G.L. 1938, ch. 578, § 40; G.L. 1956, §

33-12-12

.

33-12-13.
Disposition of assets of nonresident.

When a will is filed and recorded, or administration is granted in this state on the estate of a person who was an inhabitant of any other state, territory or district of the United States, or of a foreign country, his or her estate, real and personal, found here shall, after payment of his or her debts, be disposed of according to his or her will, if he or she left any executed according to law; otherwise, the real estate shall descend according to the laws of this state, and his or her personal estate shall be distributed and disposed of according to the laws of the state, territory, district or country of which he or she was an inhabitant.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 854; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 40; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 40; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 38; G.L. 1956, §

33-12-13

.

33-12-14.
Distribution or transfer to domiciliary executor or administrator of personalty of nonresident.

Upon the settlement of the estate, and after the payment of all debts for which the estate is liable in this state, the residue of the personal estate may be distributed and disposed of in the manner provided by this chapter by the probate court; or, in the discretion of the court, it may be transmitted to the executor or administrator, if any, in the state, territory, district or country where the deceased had his or her domicile.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 855; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 41; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 41; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 39; G.L. 1956, §

33-12-14

.

33-12-15.
Preference to citizens of state in distribution of insolvent estate of nonresident.

If a person dies insolvent, his or her estate found in this state shall, as far as practicable, be so disposed of that all his or her creditors here and elsewhere may receive each an equal share in proportion to their respective debts. To this end, his or her estate shall not be transmitted to the foreign executor or administrator until all the creditors who are citizens of this state, filing and proving their claims according to law, have received the just proportion that would be due to them if the whole estate of the deceased, wherever found, that is applicable to the payment of creditors, were divided among all the creditors in proportion to their respective debts, without preferring any one species of debt to another, excepting those preferred by the statutes of this state; and no creditor, who is not a citizen of this state, shall be paid out of the assets found here until all those who are citizens have received their just proportion as provided in this section.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 856; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 42; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 42; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 40; G.L. 1956, §

33-12-15

.

33-12-16.
Residue of insolvent estate of nonresident after payment to citizens.

If there is any residue after payment to the citizens of this state, it may be paid to any creditors who have duly filed and proved their debts here in proportion to the amount due to each of them; but no one shall receive more than would be due to him or her if the whole estate were divided ratably among all the creditors as provided in §

33-12-15

. The balance may be transmitted to the foreign executor or administrator; but if there is no foreign executor or administrator, it shall, after the expiration of four (4) years from the qualification of the administrator in this state, be distributed ratably among all creditors, both citizens and others, who have proved their debts in this state.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 857; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 43; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 43; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 41; G.L. 1956, §

33-12-16

.